test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-kaepaa_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - käpā: # Noun 41 'eng /est käpp/fin' - full paradigm
     käpā+N+Sg+Nom: käpā
     käpā+N+Sg+Gen: käpā
     käpā+N+Sg+Par: käppõ
     käpā+N+Sg+Dat: käpān
     käpā+N+Sg+Ins: käpāks
     käpā+N+Sg+Ill: käppõ
     käpā+N+Sg+Ela: käpāst
     käpā+N+Pl+Nom: käpād
     käpā+N+Pl+Gen: käpād
     käpā+N+Pl+Par: käpīdi
     käpā+N+Pl+Dat: käpādõn
     käpā+N+Pl+Ins: käpādõks
     käpā+N+Pl+Ill: käpīž
     käpā+N+Pl+Ela: käpīst
